New York, session 2025-2026, A8666.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 3 of section 181 of the navi- 2 gation law, as amended by chapter 584 of the laws of 1992 and subpara- 3 graphs (ii) and (iii) as amended by chapter 585 of the laws of 1992 and 4 as further amended by section 104 of part A of chapter 62 of the laws of 5 2011, is amended and a new paragraph (f) is added to read as follows: 6 (e) (i) The owner or operator of a vessel shall establish and maintain 7 with the department evidence of financial responsibility sufficient to 8 meet the amount of liability established pursuant to paragraph (a) of 9 this subdivision. A person may not cause or permit the operation of a 10 vessel in the state until the person has furnished to the department, 11 and the department has approved such evidence. The owner or operator of 12 any vessel which demonstrates financial responsibility pursuant to the 13 requirements of the Federal Oil Pollution Act of 1990 (33 U.S.C. 2701 et 14 seq.), shall be deemed to have demonstrated financial responsibility in 15 accordance with this paragraph. 16 (ii) The commissioner in consultation with the superintendent of 17 financial services may promulgate regulations requiring the owner or 18 operator of a major facility other than a vessel to establish and main- 19 tain evidence of financial responsibility in an amount not to exceed 20 twenty-five dollars plus an annual inflation adjustment, determined by 21 the commissioner from the increase in the consumer price index in the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11301-03-5 A. 8666--A 2 1 one-year period ending on the March thirty-first prior to such inflation 2 adjustment effective on the ensuing September first, per incident, for 3 each barrel of total petroleum storage capacity at the facility, subject 4 to a maximum of one million dollars per incident per facility in an 5 aggregate not to exceed two million dollars plus an annual inflation 6 adjustment, determined by the commissioner from the increase in the 7 consumer price index in the one-year period ending on the March thirty- 8 first prior to such inflation adjustment effective on the ensuing 9 September first, per facility per year; provided, however, that if the 10 owner or operator establishes to the satisfaction of the commissioner 11 that a lesser amount will be sufficient to protect the environment and 12 public health, safety and welfare, the commissioner shall accept 13 evidence of financial responsibility in such lesser amount. In determin- 14 ing the sufficiency of the amount of financial responsibility required 15 under this section, the commissioner and the superintendent of financial 16 services shall take into consideration facility size, storage capacity, 17 throughput, proximity to environmentally sensitive areas, type of petro- 18 leum handled, and other factors relevant to the risks posed by the class 19 or category of facility, as well as the availability and affordability 20 of pollution liability insurance. Any regulations promulgated pursuant 21 to this subparagraph shall not take effect until forty-eight months 22 after the effective date of this section. 23 (iii) Financial responsibility under this paragraph may be established 24 by any one or a combination of the following methods acceptable to the 25 commissioner in consultation with the superintendent of financial 26 services: evidence of insurance, surety bonds, guarantee, letter of 27 credit, qualification as a self-insurer, or other evidence of financial 28 responsibility, including certifications which qualify under the Federal 29 Oil Pollution Act of 1990 (33 U.S.C. 2701 et seq.). 30 (iv) The liability of a third-party insurer providing proof of finan- 31 cial responsibility on behalf of a person required to establish and 32 maintain evidence of financial responsibility under this section is 33 limited to the type of risk assumed and the amount of coverage specified 34 in the proof of financial responsibility furnished to and approved by 35 the department. For the purposes of this section, the term "third-party 36 insurer" means a third-party insurer, surety, guarantor, person furnish- 37 ing a letter of credit, or other group or person providing proof of 38 financial responsibility on behalf of another person; it does not 39 include the person required to establish and maintain evidence of such 40 financial responsibility. 41 (f) (i) Acceptance of proof of financial responsibility shall expire: 42 (1) one year from its issuance for self-insurance; 43 (2) on the effective date of a change in the surety bond, guarantee, 44 insurance agreement, letter of credit, or other proof of financial 45 responsibility; or 46 (3) on the expiration or cancellation of the surety bond, guarantee, 47 insurance agreement, letter of credit, or other proof of financial 48 responsibility. 49 (ii) The person whose proof of financial responsibility is accepted by 50 the department under this section shall notify the department at least 51 thirty days before the effective date of a change, expiration or cancel- 52 lation in the surety bond, guarantee, insurance agreement, letter of 53 credit, or other proof of financial responsibility. Application for 54 renewal of acceptance of proof of financial responsibility under this 55 section must be filed at least thirty days before the date of expira- 56 tion. A. 8666--A 3 1 (iii) The department, after notice and hearing, may revoke acceptance 2 of proof of financial responsibility if it determines that: 3 (1) acceptance was procured by fraud or misrepresentation; or 4 (2) a change of circumstance has occurred other than a change speci- 5 fied in clauses one through three of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, 6 which would have warranted denial of the application. 7 (iv) Upon acceptance and approval of proof of financial responsibility 8 under this section, the department shall issue to the applicant a 9 certificate stating that the state's financial responsibility require- 10 ments have been satisfied. The certificate must include the name of the 11 major facility, vessel, or pipeline for which it is issued and the expi- 12 ration date of the certificate. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 14 it shall have become a law.